New Jersey, session 221, A4922.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The prosecutor of each county shall collect, record, and report data to the Attorney General regarding a crime or, in the case of a juvenile, an act which if committed by an adult would constitute a crime, involving the use of a firearm as defined in subsection f. of N.J.S.2C:39-1 that did not result in bodily injury. b.    The prosecutor of each county shall provide information to the Attorney General regarding criminal complaints pursuant to subsection a. of this section, which shall include: (1)   the complaint number; (2)   the date and time of the incident; (3)   the location of the incident, including the county, municipality, and address; (4)   the statutory citation and degree of all offenses charged; and (5)   whether the defendant lawfully or unlawfully used the firearm subject to the charge. The prosecutor of each county shall provide the information required in this subsection for criminal complaints, regardless of whether the case is prosecuted, dismissed, or downgraded. 2.    The prosecutor of each county shall submit the information required by section 1 of P.L. , c. (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to the Attorney General on a quarterly basis for a period of five years, starting on January 1 next following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), in a manner prescribed by the Attorney General. In accordance with section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), the Attorney General shall submit a report of the information collected to the Governor and the Legislature at the conclusion of the five years.  The report shall be posted on the Department of Law and Public Safety's website. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.